Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2210.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Electronic REGISTRATION product." An electronic extension of the department-issued physical product that conveys the <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 authority for a vehicle to operate on a highway."Electronic REGISTRATION product device." A computer, tablet, smart phone or other electronic personal device used by an electronic product holder to access or display an electronic REGISTRATION product. "Electronic registration card." An electronic representation of a physical registration card, including a digital photograph of a valid registration card, that is viewable on an electronic REGISTRATION product device. An electronic registration card shall be considered the same as a physical registration card issued by the department.* * *Section 2. Sections 1308(a) and 1311, 1311 AND 1317 of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1308. Issuance of registration card.(a) General rule.--The department, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue to the registrant a physical registration card or electronic registration card which shall contain the registration number assigned to the vehicle, the name and address of the registrant and the name of the owner, if other than the registrant, a description of the vehicle including the vehicle identification number, the expiration date and such other information as may be determined by the department.* * *§ 1311. Registration card to be signed and exhibited on demand.(a) Signing card.--Upon receiving the physical registration card or any duplicate, the registrant shall sign his name in the space provided.(b) Carrying and exhibiting card.--Every registration card shall, at all times while the vehicle is being operated upon a 20260HB2210PN3054 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 highway, be in the possession of the person driving or in control of the vehicle or carried in the vehicle and shall be exhibited upon demand of any police officer.(c) Production to avoid penalty.--No person shall be convicted of violating this section or section 1301 (relating to driving unregistered vehicle prohibited) if the person produces at the office of the issuing authority or at the office of the arresting police officer within five days of the violation, a physical registration card or electronic registration card valid in this Commonwealth at the time of the arrest.(d) Surrender of electronic REGISTRATION product device not required.--(1) A statute or regulation that requires an individual to surrender a registration card to a police officer shall not apply to an electronic REGISTRATION product device. (2) If an individual chooses to surrender an electronic REGISTRATION product device to a police officer who inadvertently causes damage to the electronic REGISTRATION PRODUCT device, the police officer shall not be liable for the damage to the electronic REGISTRATION product device. (e) Privacy of information on electronic product device.-- (1) If a registrant exhibits an electronic registration card upon demand by a police officer under this section, the police officer may review the electronic registration card using the electronic product device.(2) If a police officer inadvertently reviews information on an electronic product device that is not related to an electronic registration card, the inadvertently reviewed information may not be used as evidence in a civil or criminal trial.20260HB2210PN3054 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) PRIVACY OF INFORMATION ON ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION PRODUCT DEVICE.--(1) IF A REGISTRANT EXHIBITS AN ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION CARD UPON DEMAND BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER UNDER THIS SECTION, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER:(I) MAY ONLY REVIEW THE ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION CARD VIA THE ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION PRODUCT DEVICE.(II) SHALL PROMPTLY RETURN THE ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION PRODUCT DEVICE TO THE REGISTRANT ONCE THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER HAS HAD AN OPPORTUNITY TO VERIFY THE VEHICLE REGISTRATION INFORMATION AND STATUS OF THE VEHICLE REGISTRATION.(2) THE EXHIBITION OF AN ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION CARD BY A REGISTRANT SHALL NOT SERVE AS CONSENT FOR A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER TO SEARCH OR ACCESS ANY OTHER DATA OR APPLICATION ON THE ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION PRODUCT DEVICE.(f) Immunity.--If a registrant chooses to exhibit an electronic registration card or electronic REGISTRATION product device under this title, the individual viewing the electronic registration card in good faith for a purpose under this title shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that arises from the registrant's choice, including:(1) The inadvertent viewing of information on the electronic REGISTRATION product device other than the electronic registration card.(2) The inadvertent deletion of information from the electronic REGISTRATION product device. (3) The inadvertent interception of a communication while in possession of the electronic REGISTRATION product device.20260HB2210PN3054 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Any breakage that may occur to the electronic REGISTRATION product device. § 1317. ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF LITTERING PROVISIONS.ON EVERY VEHICLE REGISTRATION CARD, THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT SHALL BE PRINTED [IMMEDIATELY ABOVE OR BELOW THE SIGNATURE OF THE APPLICANT]:I HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGE THIS DAY THAT I HAVE RECEIVED NOTICE OF THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 3709 OF THE VEHICLE CODE.ALSO PRINTED ON THE REGISTRATION CARD SHALL BE THE FOLLOWING:SECTION 3709 PROVIDES FOR A FINE OF UP TO $300 FOR DROPPING, THROWING OR DEPOSITING, UPON ANY HIGHWAY, OR UPON ANY OTHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE PROPERTY WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE OWNER THEREOF OR INTO OR ON THE WATERS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH FROM A VEHICLE, ANY WASTE PAPER, SWEEPINGS, ASHES, HOUSEHOLD WASTE, GLASS, METAL, REFUSE OR RUBBISH OR ANY DANGEROUS OR DETRIMENTAL SUBSTANCE, OR PERMITTING ANY OF THE PRECEDING WITHOUT IMMEDIATELY REMOVING SUCH ITEMS OR CAUSING THEIR REMOVAL.FOR ANY VIOLATION OF SECTION 3709, I MAY BE SUBJECT TO A FINE OF UP TO $300 UPON CONVICTION, INCLUDING ANY VIOLATION RESULTING FROM THE CONDUCT OF ANY OTHER PERSONS OPERATING, IN POSSESSION OF OR PRESENT WITHIN THIS VEHICLE WITH MY PERMISSION, IF I DO NOT WITH REASONABLE CERTAINTY IDENTIFY THE DRIVER OF THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2210PN3054 - 5 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526